Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 6. Oil and Gas Exploration Licenses; Leases.

Sec. 38.05.131.
Applicability; determination; regulations.

Unless specifically provided otherwise in AS

38.05.132

—

38.05.134

, the provisions of AS

38.05.005

—

38.05.037

,

38.05.140(f)

,

38.05.180

,

38.05.182

—

38.05.184

, and

38.05.920

—

38.05.990

apply to the issuance of exploration licenses and leases for oil and gas, or for gas only, as appropriate, under AS

38.05.132

—

38.05.134

.

The provisions of AS

38.05.131

—

38.05.134

do not apply to land

north of the Umiat baseline; and

in the vicinity of Cook Inlet that is within the area bounded by

the north boundary of Township 17 North, Seward Meridian;

the Seward Meridian;

the south boundary of Township 7 South, Seward Meridian; and

the west boundary of Range 19 West, Seward Meridian.

The commissioner shall make preliminary written determinations of the state land that may be subject to the provisions of AS

38.05.132

. The determinations shall be given public notice using the methods described in AS

38.05.945(b)

. After completion of the comment period and evaluation of the comments received, the commissioner shall issue a written determination of the state land that is subject to the provisions of AS

38.05.132

.

The commissioner may adopt regulations necessary to implement AS

38.05.131

—

38.05.134

.

The commissioner may not issue exploration licenses to a licensee so that, at any one time, the licensee holds exploration licenses on more than 2,000,000 acres.

History.

(§ 2 ch 35 SLA 1994; am § 22 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 14 ch 49 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For qualifications, see 11 AAC 82, art. 2.

For acreage limitations, see 11 AAC 82, art. 3.

For competitive bidding, see 11 AAC 82, art. 4.

For records and reports, see 11 AAC 82, art. 8.

For exploration licensing, see 11 AAC 82, art. 9.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 8, ch. 35, SLA 1994 provides: “In addition to the area designated in AS

38.05.131(b)

, added by § 2 of this Act, the provisions of AS

38.05.131

—

38.05.134

, added by § 2 of this Act, do not apply to land within proposed Competitive Oil and Gas Lease Sales 80, 87, and 88, as the area to be offered in each of those proposed competitive oil and gas lease sales was delineated in the Five-Year Oil and Gas Leasing Program prepared by the Department of Natural Resources and dated January 1993. However, the exclusion of the land in any one of those lease sales that is required by this section ceases on the date the land described in the lease sale is first offered for competitive oil and gas leasing under AS

38.05.180

, and that land is thereafter subject to the provisions of AS

38.05.131

—

38.05.134

, added by § 2 of this Act.”

Sec. 38.05.132.
Exploration license for oil and gas or gas only.

To encourage exploration for oil and gas on state land, the commissioner may issue exploration licenses. The commissioner may limit the exploration licenses under AS

38.05.132

—

38.05.134

to exploration for and recovery of gas only. The commissioner may not issue an exploration license on land that is held under an existing coal lease entered into under AS

38.05.150

that has an active permit for exploration or mining unless the licensee under this subsection is also the lessee under AS

38.05.150

of that land.

An exploration license issued under this section gives the licensee

the exclusive right to explore, for a term not to exceed 10 years, on unleased state land described in the exploration license for deposits of oil and gas, or for deposits of gas only, as appropriate, unless the exploration license is terminated under (d)(1) of this section or the land is earlier relinquished, removed, or deleted under (d)(2) of this section; and

unless the exploration license is terminated under (d)(1) of this section, the option to convert the exploration license for all or part of the state land, except the land that is deleted or removed from the land described in the exploration license under (d)(2) of this section, into an oil and gas lease, or a gas lease only, as appropriate, upon fulfillment of the work commitments contained in the exploration license.

An exploration license awarded under this section

is not subject to the acreage limitations imposed by AS

38.05.140(c)

or

38.05.180(m)

;

may cover, subject to the maximum acreage limitation on exploration licenses by one licensee under AS

38.05.131(e)

, an area of not less than 10,000 acres and not more than 500,000 acres, that must be reasonably compact and contiguous;

must be conditioned upon an obligation to perform a specified work commitment, in total for the term of the license, expressed in dollars of direct exploration expenditures; the specified work commitment

may include a provision that adjusts the total amount of work commitment, expressed in dollars of direct exploration expenditures, to account for inflation;

must include a requirement that the licensee complete at least 25 percent of the licensee’s total specified work commitment by the fourth anniversary of the effective date of the issuance of the exploration license;

must be conditioned upon the posting of a bond or other security acceptable to the commissioner, in favor of the state and subject to the following requirements:

the bond or other security must be renewed annually;

the annual bond or other security shall be calculated as the entire work commitment expressed in dollars, less the cumulative direct exploration expenditures of the licensee as of the last day of the most recent project year, divided by the number of years remaining in the term of the exploration license;

is subject to an annual review and revocation if the commissioner determines that the licensee has failed to provide or maintain in effect the bond or other security required by (4) of this subsection;

must be conditioned upon the licensee’s payment to the state of a nonrefundable exploration license fee of $1 for each acre of land or fraction of each acre that is subject to the exploration license; and

must be conditioned upon an agreement that exploration expenditures are subject to audit by the commissioner.

If, on the fourth anniversary of the effective date of the issuance of the exploration license awarded under this section,

the licensee has not completed at least 25 percent of the licensee’s total specified work commitment, as measured by the licensee’s direct exploration expenditures, the exploration license terminates;

the licensee has completed at least 25 percent but has not completed at least 50 percent of the licensee’s total specified work commitment, as measured by the licensee’s direct exploration expenditure, the commissioner shall remove or delete or shall require the licensee to relinquish a portion of the area within the exploration license; relinquishment, removal, or deletion of an area from the state land described in the exploration license terminates the licensee’s rights under AS

38.05.131

—

38.05.134

in the area that is relinquished, removed, or deleted; a relinquishment, removal, or deletion of a portion of the area described in the exploration license must be in areas that are reasonably compact and contiguous; the areas relinquished from the state land described in the exploration license must be areas identified by the licensee but, if the licensee fails to identify sufficient area, the commissioner may identify any additional acreage required to be removed or deleted from the area under license to meet the requirements of this subsection; within the area described in the exploration license issued under (a) — (c) of this section,

25 percent must be relinquished, removed, or deleted not later than the fourth anniversary of the effective date of the issuance of the exploration license;

an additional 10 percent of the acreage remaining after relinquishment, removal, or deletion of acreage required by (A) of this paragraph and by previous relinquishments, removals, or deletions under this paragraph must be removed or deleted on each of the succeeding anniversaries of the effective date of the issuance of the exploration license;

the cumulative total of the acreage relinquished, removed, or deleted under (A) and (B) of this paragraph may not be required to exceed 50 percent of the area awarded within the original exploration license area.

If, immediately before the beginning of the period for annual renewal of the bond or other security under (c)(4)(A) of this section, the licensee fails to provide or maintain in effect the bond or other security required by (c) of this section for the period covered by the annual renewal and the commissioner revokes the exploration license, the bond or other security then in effect for the licensee’s obligations under the exploration license is forfeited to the state.

In this section,

“direct exploration expenditure” means cash expenses undertaken in performance of a specified work commitment under the provisions of AS

38.05.131

—

38.05.134

and necessarily incurred by the licensee in the permitting, mobilization, conducting, demobilization, and evaluation of geophysical and geological surveys, or the drilling, logging, coring, testing, and evaluation of oil and gas or gas only wells; the term

includes direct labor costs, including the cost of benefits, for employees directly associated with the work commitment programs, the cost of renting or leasing equipment from parties not affiliated with the licensee, the reasonable costs of maintaining and operating equipment, payments to consultants and independent contractors not affiliated with the licensee, and costs of materials and supplies;

does not include noncash expenses such as depreciation and reserves, interest or other costs of borrowed funds, return on investment, overhead, insurance or bond premiums, or any other expense that is unreasonable or that the licensee has not incurred to satisfy the licensee’s work commitment;

“work commitment” includes the drilling of one or more exploration wells or the gathering of data from activities described in (1) of this subsection, or both.

History.

(§ 2 ch 35 SLA 1994; am §§ 15 — 18 ch 49 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, in (f)(2) of this section, “(1) of this subsection” was substituted for “(f)(1) of this section” to correct a manifest error.

Administrative Code. —

For acreage limitations, see 11 AAC 82, art. 3.

For records and reports, see 11 AAC 82, art. 8.

For exploration licensing, see 11 AAC 82, art. 9.

Sec. 38.05.133.
License procedures.

The procedures in this section apply to the issuance of an exploration license under AS

38.05.132

.

The licensing process is initiated by the commissioner preparing, or a prospective licensee submitting to the commissioner, a proposal that identifies a specific area to be subject to the exploration license, proposes specific minimum work commitments, and states the minimum qualifications for a licensee as established by regulations adopted by the commissioner. A prospective licensee may initiate a proposal only in response to a call for proposals by the commissioner or during a period specified in regulations adopted by the commissioner. The regulations must provide for at least one period for that purpose during each calendar year.

If the commissioner initiates the licensing process under (b) of this section, the commissioner shall publish notice of the commissioner’s proposal in order to solicit comments and competing proposals.

Within 30 days after receipt of a proposal from a prospective licensee under (b) of this section, the commissioner shall either reject it in a written decision or give public notice of the intent to evaluate the acceptability of the proposal. The commissioner shall solicit comments on a proposal for which public notice is given under this subsection, and shall request competing proposals.

The commissioner may make a written request to a prospective licensee for additional information on the prospective licensee’s proposal. The commissioner shall keep confidential information described in AS

38.05.035(a)(8)

that is voluntarily provided if the prospective licensee has made a written request that the information remain confidential.

After considering proposals not rejected under (d) of this section and public comment on those proposals, the commissioner shall issue a written finding addressing all matters set out in AS

38.05.035(e)

and (g), except for AS

38.05.035(g)(1)(B)(xi)

. If the finding concludes that the state’s best interests would be served by issuing an exploration license, the finding must (1) describe the limitations, stipulations, conditions, or changes from the initiating proposal or competing proposals that are required to make the issuance of the exploration license conform to the best interests of the state, and (2) if only one proposal was submitted, identify the prospective licensee whom the commissioner finds should be issued the exploration license. The commissioner shall attach to the finding a copy of the exploration license to be issued and the form of lease that will be used for any portion of the exploration license area subsequently converted to a lease under AS

38.05.134

.

If only one prospective licensee submits a proposal and the finding under (f) of this section concludes that an exploration license should be issued to that prospective licensee, the prospective licensee has 30 days after issuance of the finding within which to accept or reject the issuance of the exploration license, as limited or conditioned by the terms contained in the finding. The exploration license to be issued and the form of lease that will be used must be attached to that finding. The prospective licensee must accept or reject the issuance of the exploration license in writing.

If competing proposals are submitted, and the commissioner’s finding under (f) of this section concludes that an exploration license should be issued, the commissioner shall issue a request for competitive sealed bids, under procedures adopted by the commissioner by regulation, to determine which prospective licensee should be issued the exploration license. The finding provided to the prospective licensees and the public under (f) of this section must contain notice that (1) the commissioner intends to request competitive sealed bids, (2) a prospective licensee who intends to participate in the bidding must notify the commissioner in writing by the date specified in the notice, and (3) a prospective licensee’s notice of intent to participate in the bidding constitutes acceptance of issuance of the exploration license, as limited or conditioned by the terms contained in the finding and by the exploration license to be issued and the form of lease to be used that have been attached to that finding, if the prospective licensee is the successful bidder. The successful bidder is the prospective licensee who submits the highest bid in terms of the minimum work commitment dollar amount.

History.

(§ 2 ch 35 SLA 1994; am §§ 19 — 21 ch 49 SLA 2004; am § 7 ch 1 SSSLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in subsection (f), “AS

38.05.035(g)(1)(B)(xi)

” was substituted for “AS 38.05.035(g)(1)(K)” to reconcile chapters 35 and 38, SLA 1994.

Administrative Code. —

For qualifications, see 11 AAC 82, art. 2.

For competitive bidding, see 11 AAC 82, art. 4.

For exploration licensing, see 11 AAC 82, art. 9.

Sec. 38.05.134.
Conversion to lease.

If the licensee requests and the commissioner determines that the work commitment obligation set out in an exploration license issued under AS

38.05.132

has been met, the commissioner shall convert to one or more leases all or part, as the licensee may indicate, of the area described in the exploration license that remains after the relinquishments, removals, or deletions required by AS

38.05.132

(d)(2). A lease issued under this section

is subject to the acreage limitations imposed by AS

38.05.140(c)

;

is subject to AS

38.05.180(j)

— (m), (o) — (u), and (x) — (z);

must be conditioned upon a royalty in amount or value of not less than 12.5 percent of production, except that the lessee who, proceeding under AS

38.05.131

—

38.05.134

, under a lease issued in the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin who is the first to file with the commissioner a nonconfidential sworn statement claiming to be the first to have drilled a well discovering oil or gas in a previously undiscovered oil or gas pool and who is certified by the commissioner within one year of completion of that discovery well to have drilled a well in that pool that is capable of producing in paying quantities shall pay a royalty of five percent on all production of oil or gas from that pool attributable to that lease for a period of 10 years following the date of discovery of that pool, and thereafter the royalty payable on all production of oil or gas from the pool attributable to that lease shall be determined and payable as specified in the lease; the payment of the five percent royalty under this paragraph is authorized only to a holder of a lease who meets the requirements of AS

38.05.180(f)(4)

;

must include an annual rent of $3 per acre or fraction of an acre initially paid to the state at inception of the lease and payable annually after that until the income to the state from royalty under that lease exceeds the rental income to the state under that lease for that year; and

is subject to other conditions and obligations that are specified in the lease.

History.

(§ 2 ch 35 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 1996; am § 22 ch 49 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For exploration licensing, see 11 AAC 82, art. 9.

For Cook Inlet discovery royalty, see 11 AAC 83, art. 10.